Utah statutes.
62A-4a-703.   Division as public authority.

The "appropriate public authorities," as used in Article III of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children shall, with reference to this state, mean the division.  The division shall receive and act with reference to notices required by Article III of the compact.

